Tennessee, session 114, SB0547.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 40, Chapter 3, is amended by adding
the following new section:
40-3-106.
(a) This section takes effect in any county immediately upon approval by two-
thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body.
(b) It is the duty of the clerk of every court having jurisdiction of state
misdemeanors and felonies to include in every misdemeanor and felony cost bill, a
charge of twelve dollars and fifty cents ($12.50) that must be remitted to the county
government, except in counties that are part of a multiple county judicial district as
defined in § 16-2-506, in which case this charge must be remitted to the office of the
executive director of the district attorneys general conference for the purpose of
providing supplemental funding for the office of the district attorney general within that
judicial district. Any unencumbered moneys and any unexpended balance of such funds
remaining at the end of a fiscal year do not revert to the state general fund but must be
carried forward for the purpose for which they were originally intended.
(c) All costs collected by county governments pursuant to this section must be
used for providing support services for the purpose of promoting public safety at the sole
discretion of the district attorney general for that county's respective judicial district.
SB0547
000383
- 1 -

(d) A county may supplement the funds of the district attorney general system to
promote public safety. The costs collected by the county under this section are
supplemental and in addition to any funds received under this chapter or under title 8,
chapter 7, relative to district attorneys general.
(e) This section does not apply to nonmoving traffic violations.
(f) In every misdemeanor and felony prosecution in which restitution is ordered
or the privilege tax for the criminal injuries compensation fund established by § 40-24-
107 is also levied, the cost imposed by this section does not have priority over collection
of that restitution or privilege tax.
(g) A district attorney general receiving or directing funding pursuant to this
section shall submit a report to the district attorneys general conference no later than
January 1 of each year detailing the amount of costs charged and collected and the
purposes for which the funds were used in the year immediately preceding such date.
The district attorneys general conference shall provide a corresponding report no later
than February 15 of each year to the chair of the judiciary committee of the senate, the
chair of the criminal justice committee of the house of representatives, and the chairs of
the finance, ways and means committees of the senate and the house of
representatives, providing such information in aggregate and by district.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000383